Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1359
Affirmative Action Administrator; selection.

The Affirmative Action Administrator shall be selected by the Director of Personnel.

Laws 1979, LB 500, § 5;

Laws 1987, LB 491, § 19.